Utah statutes.
79-5-201.   Recreational Trails Advisory Council.

(1)  The division shall establish a Recreational Trails Advisory Council.

(2)  The council shall advise and make recommendations to the board and division regarding:

(a)  trails to be established;

(b)  facilities to be constructed;

(c)  development costs;

(d)  modes of travel permitted;

(e)  law enforcement;

(f)  selection of rights-of-way;

(g)  interlocal agreements;

(h)  selection of signs and markers;

(i)  the general administration of trails;

(j)  distribution of matching funds pursuant to Section 79-5-501; and

(k)  future funding mechanisms for trail development.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

